District of Columbia statutes.
47-2313

Public hackers not affected.

Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed in any wise to affect the provisions of §§ 47-2829 to 47-2831.

History

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 16
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(o), 46 DCR 2118

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2313.
1973 Ed., § 47-1914.